Hawaii statutes.
§576E-17 Medical support enforcement. (a)
Where the responsible parent is ordered to provide medical insurance coverage
for the dependent child, the standard notice for such medical support
prescribed by Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, as amended by the agency,
shall be issued. The agency shall forward a copy of the notice, by regular
mail, by personal delivery, or by transmission through electronic means, to the
responsible parent's employer or union when the responsible parent fails to
provide written proof to the agency, within thirty days of receipt of the
order, that the insurance has been obtained, that application for insurance
coverage has been made, or within two business days after the date of entry of
a responsible parent in a Title IV-D case in the state directory of new hires,
whichever shall first occur.

(b) Upon receipt of the copy of the notice, or
upon request of the responsible parent pursuant to the order, the employer or
union shall transfer the notice to the appropriate plan providing health care
coverage for which the child is eligible within twenty business days after the
date of the notice or enroll the dependent child as a beneficiary in the group
medical insurance plan and withhold any required premium from the responsible
parent's income. If more than one plan is offered by the employer or union,
the child shall be enrolled in the plan in which the responsible parent is
enrolled or the least costly plan otherwise available to the responsible parent
that is comparable to the plan in which the responsible parent is enrolled. An
employer who has received a copy of the notice shall inform the agency when the
employment of the responsible parent is terminated.

(c) A dependent child whom a responsible
parent is required to cover as a beneficiary pursuant to this section is
eligible for insurance coverage as a dependent of the responsible parent until
the duty of support expires or until further court or administrative order.
The insurance coverage shall not be terminated prior to the expiration of the
duty of support or the entry of an order relieving the responsible parent of
the duty to provide insurance coverage, unless it is determined by the agency
that insurance coverage is being provided through appropriate alternative
means.

(d) The signature of the custodial parent of
the insured dependent child is a valid authorization to the insurer for
purposes of processing an insurance reimbursement payment to the provider of
medical services. When an order for dependent insurance coverage is in effect
and the responsible parent's employment is terminated, or the insurance
coverage is terminated, the insurer shall notify the agency within ten days of
the termination date with notice of conversion privileges, if any.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, when an order for insurance coverage is in effect, the responsible
parent's employer or union shall release to the agency, upon request,
information on the dependent coverage available to the responsible parent, including
the name of the insurer. The employer or union shall also provide any other
information and perform all tasks as required by the notice issued pursuant to
this section.

(f) Any responsible parent who fails to comply
with an order requiring the maintenance of insurance coverage for the dependent
child shall be liable for any medical expenses incurred by the obligee or the
State after the effective date of the order.

(g) The agency may terminate the requirement
for the responsible parent's employer or union to enroll the dependent child as
a beneficiary in the group medical insurance plan and withhold any required
premium from the responsible parent's income by sending a notice to the
employer or union by regular mail, by personal delivery, or by transmission
through electronic means. The notice shall be issued upon determination by the
agency that the obligor no longer is required to provide medical insurance
coverage or that such coverage is being provided by another employer. [L 1988,
c 154, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 176, §23; am L 1997, c 293, §39; am L 2002, c 19,
§1; am L 2005, c 26, §5; am L 2012, c 35, §2]

Cross References

Medicaid-related mandates, see chapter 431L.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next